Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 5 Writs, Summons and Process

9-5-1.
Writs in name of state — Seal — Signature by clerk or justice.

Writs issuing from any court shall issue in the name of the state of Rhode Island, shall be under the seal of the court from which they issue, and shall be signed by the clerk or by one of the justices thereof.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 498; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-1

; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 5, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 5, effective June 23, 2021.

9-5-2.
Counties in which superior court writs made and returnable.

Any original writ or writ of mesne process from the superior court for any county may be sealed and signed by the clerk of the court for any county and be made returnable in any other county where the court may sit.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 499; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 2; P.L. 1942, ch. 1143, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-2

.

9-5-3.
Facsimile signature of clerk or seal of the court.

A facsimile of the signature of the clerk of the superior court for each of the counties of Providence and Bristol, Newport, Washington, and Kent, or the district court for each division, imprinted by him or her, with the seal of the court affixed or a facsimile of the court seal, upon any civil process, original, supplementary, or final, or upon any copy of or accompanying the process, or upon any subpoena, or upon any other paper requiring the signature of the clerk and the seal of the court issuing out of the court of which he or she is clerk, except complaints and warrants, mittimuses, capiases, remands, and writs of habeas corpus, shall have the same validity as his or her written signature.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1315, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 3; P.L. 1918, ch. 1611, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2017, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-3

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 8; P.L. 2014, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 315, § 1.

9-5-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 500; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-4

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 14, effective January 10, 1966.

9-5-5.
Form of writs from supreme and superior courts.

All writs issuing from the supreme or superior court shall be in such form as the court shall prescribe, except if express provision is made by statute.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 501; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-5

.

9-5-6.
Writs and process operating throughout state — Officers to whom directed.

All writs, executions, and process shall run throughout the state and shall be directed for service to the division of sheriffs, or to a certified constable, but if any deputy sheriff is a party to the action or suit, the process shall be directed to the town sergeant or a certified constable and may be served by any one of them not a party to the action or suit.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 502; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 6; P.L. 1930, ch. 1618, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1900, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-6

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 13; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 16; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 8; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 8.

9-5-7.
Direction of writs for arrest or execution against the body.

All writs whatsoever commanding the arrest of a defendant, or executions running against the body of a defendant, shall be directed for service to the division of sheriffs or to a certified constable authorized pursuant to §

9-5-10.1

, or if the writ is to be served in the town of New Shoreham, it may be directed to the town sergeant of the town, subject to the provisions of §

9-5-8

, and no writ of arrest shall be served by any other officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 784, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 515, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-7

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 16; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 8; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 8.

9-5-8.
Power of New Shoreham town sergeant — Bond.

The town sergeant of the town of New Shoreham is hereby authorized and empowered to serve any writ and civil or criminal process in the town of New Shoreham and the waters adjacent thereto within the jurisdiction of the state, the ad damnum of which does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), as fully and effectually as a member of the division of sheriffs; provided, that the town sergeant of New Shoreham give bond, with two (2) sufficient sureties, to the general treasurer in the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000). In case any person is injured by the breach of the bond, he or she may sue upon the bond in like manner as he or she might do upon a sheriff’s bond in a like case under the provisions of §§

42-29-12

and

42-29-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1897, ch. 499, §§ 1, 2; C.P.A. 1905, § 1206; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, §§ 2, 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, §§ 2, 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 515, §§ 2, 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-8

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 16.

9-5-9.
Warrants for commitment to state-operated facilities.

Any warrant or mittimus issued from any superior or district court committing any person to the Eleanor Slater hospital or Rhode Island state psychiatric hospital shall be directed to and executed by duly authorized agents of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, who shall make return thereon, the provisions of any other law to the contrary notwithstanding.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 349, § 6; P.L. 1930, ch. 1618, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1900, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-9

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 16; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 3, effective June 27, 2022.

9-5-10.
Direction and return of district courts writs and summonses.

Writs and summonses issued by a district court shall be made returnable to the court at the place and on the day and hour provided by law, to be named in the writs and summonses, and shall, except as otherwise specifically provided, be directed to the division of sheriffs, or to the town sergeants, or to a certified constable authorized pursuant to §

9-5-10.1

. In case any person upon whom it is necessary to make service of any writ, summons, or execution issued by a district court is, or has estate, in any other county than the one in which the action is brought, the writ, summons, or execution may also be directed to and served by the like officer of such other county.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 503; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-10

; P.L. 1964, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 13; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 6; P.L. 1967, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 8; P.L. 1971, ch. 183, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 16; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 8; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 8.

9-5-10.1.
Certification of constables.

A person at least twenty-one (21) years of age who complies with the statute and the requirements set forth in any regulations promulgated by the department of business regulation may file an application with the department requesting that the applicant be certified as a constable. Once issued by the department, the certification shall be effective for a period of two (2) years or until the approval is withdrawn by the department. A certified constable shall be entitled to serve or execute writs and process in such capacity for any court of the state, anywhere in the state, subject to any terms and limitations as set forth by the court.

A person to be certified as a constable shall provide documentation and evidence satisfactory to the department of business regulations that the person possesses the specified minimum qualifications to include:

Sixty (60) hours of earned credit from an accredited college, university, or institution; or

Four (4) years of honorable military service; or

Twenty (20) years of honorable service with a local, state, or federal law enforcement agency; and

United State citizenship; and

Possession of a valid motor vehicle operator’s license; and

Successful completion of unlawful drug use screening; and

Successful completion of psychological testing approved by the department of business regulation.

Certification process.

Application.

Any person seeking certification pursuant to this section shall complete an application and submit it to the department of business regulation in the form designated by the department for such applications.

The application shall include information determined by the department to be relevant to licensure and shall include a national criminal background check.

Referral to certified constables’ board. Once the applicant has provided a completed application, the department shall refer the applicant to the certified constables’ board by providing a copy of the application to the board.

Training.

Following review of the application, the board shall determine whether the applicant should be recommended for training to be conducted by a volunteer training constable. If the board determines that training is appropriate, the applicant shall be assigned to a training constable who shall be a constable in good standing for a minimum of ten (10) years and who is approved by the department.

Training shall consist of a minimum of ninety (90) hours to be completed no sooner than ninety (90) days from the date of the referral by the board. The department may waive the training requirement of this section for an applicant who has graduated from a certified police or law enforcement academy and who has a minimum of twenty (20) years of honorable service as a police or law enforcement officer.

Within thirty (30) days from the conclusion of training, a written report shall be submitted by the training constable to the board with a copy to the department that reflects the dates and times of training and comments on the aptitude of the trainee.

If the board concludes that training is not appropriate or if the report of the training constable concludes that the applicant does not have the aptitude to perform the duties of a constable, the board shall so inform the department which shall deny the application on that basis.

Oral and written tests.

Upon the successful completion of the training period and recommendation from the training constable, within ninety (90) days, the applicant shall complete an oral examination on the legal and practical aspects of certified constables’ duties that shall be created and administered by the board.

Upon the successful completion of the oral examination, within sixty (60) days the applicant must complete a written test created by the board and approved by the department that measures the applicant’s knowledge of state law and court procedure.

If the board concludes that the applicant has not successfully passed either the oral or written test, the board shall so inform the department which shall deny the application on that basis.

Final review. The department shall review the application, training record, test scores, and such other information or documentation as required and shall determine whether the applicant shall be approved for certification and the person authorized to serve process in the state.

Any person certified as a constable on the effective date of this act shall continue to be certified without complying with the certification requirements prescribed by this act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 9; P.L. 2021, ch. 221, § 1, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 222, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 6, effective June 27, 2022.

9-5-10.2.
Posting of bond by certified constables.

Upon filing of the application and training required by §

9-5-10.1

, an applicant shall submit an application fee in the amount of four hundred dollars ($400) and deposit a bond with sufficient sureties in the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office conditioned to protect members of the public and persons contracting with the certified constable against any damage arising from any actionable misconduct on the part of the applicant while serving as a certified constable. The terms of the bond shall include notification by the surety issuing the bond to the department if the bond is revoked, cancelled, or otherwise not in effect. Failure to keep the bond in effect shall be grounds for revocation of the certification to act as a constable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 9.

9-5-10.3.
Powers and authority of certified constables.

No certified constable shall display any badge, emblem, or certification in the course of his or her duties except that which is issued or authorized by the department of business regulation, nor shall any certified constable misrepresent himself or herself as a law enforcement officer or peace officer.

Certified constables shall have no power or authority other than to serve process and execute writs as provided by this section.

The powers and authority of any constable who is presently approved to serve process by the district court shall continue in full force and effect until such time that his or her application for certification is approved in accordance with the certification process set forth in §

9-5-10.5

, but in no event shall such period exceed two (2) years.

No certified constable, while serving or executing any process or writ issued by or returnable to the court, is liable in any civil action to respond in damages as a result of his or her acts of commission or omission arising directly out of his or her negligent serving or executing the process or writ except as provided in §

9-5-10.5

. In the event a civil action is brought against a certified constable as the result of the performance of his or her duties, the constable is entitled to recover all costs and attorney’s fees incurred by the certified constable incidental to the civil action.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 9.

9-5-10.4.
Renewal of certification of certified constables.

A certified constable shall be required to renew his or her certification every two (2) years. Any certified constable failing to renew his or her certification shall no longer be approved to serve as a certified constable. At the time of renewal, the certified constable shall submit a renewal application fee of four hundred dollars ($400) and provide evidence that he or she has completed ten (10) hours of approved continuing education in the areas of service of process within the prior twenty-four-month (24) period, and such courses shall be approved by the Independent Constables Association, Inc. and/or the Rhode Island Constables, Inc., along with proof of sufficient bond, a current criminal background check, and current contact information. Failure to provide any of these items shall be grounds to deny renewal of the certification.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 9.

9-5-10.5.
Suspension, revocation or review of certification of certified constables.

Upon the receipt of a written complaint, request of the board, request of a judge of any court, or upon its own initiative, the department shall ascertain the facts and, if warranted, hold a hearing for the reprimand, suspension, or revocation of a certification. The director, or his or her designee, has the power to refuse a certification for cause or to suspend or revoke a certification or place an applicant on probation for any of the following reasons:

The certification was obtained by false representation or by fraudulent act or conduct;

Failure to report to the department any of the following within thirty (30) days of the occurrence:

Any criminal prosecution taken in any jurisdiction. The constable shall provide the initial complaint filed and any other relevant legal documents;

Any change of name, address or other contact information;

Any administrative action taken against the constable in any jurisdiction by any government agency within or outside of this state. The report shall include a copy of all relevant legal documents;

Failure to respond to the department within ten (10) days to any written inquiry from the department;

Where a certified constable, in performing or attempting to perform any of the acts mentioned in this section, is found to have committed any of the following:

Inappropriate conduct that fails to promote public confidence, including failure to maintain impartiality, equity, and fairness in the conduct of his or her duties;

Neglect, misfeasance, or malfeasance of his or her duties;

Failure to adhere to court policies, rules, procedures, or regulations;

Failure to maintain the highest standards of personal integrity, honesty, and truthfulness, including misrepresentation, bad faith, dishonesty, incompetence, or an arrest or conviction of a crime.

A copy of the determination of the director of the department of business regulation, or his or her designee, shall be forwarded to the chief judge of the district court within ten (10) business days.

Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the chief of any court from suspending the certification of a constable to serve process within his or her respective court pending the outcome of an investigation consistent with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

The department is authorized to levy an administrative penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation for failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or with any rule or regulation promulgated by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 9; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 6, effective June 27, 2022.

9-5-10.6.
Certified constables’ board.

There shall be created a certified constables’ board that shall review each applicant and recommend him or her for training, conduct the oral examination of each applicant, and that shall serve as a resource to the department in the consideration of the practical aspects of constable practice. The board shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor: two (2) who shall be constables in good standing who have served for at least ten (10) years, one of whom shall be recommended by the Rhode Island Constables, Inc. and one recommended by the Rhode Island Constables Association; and three (3) attorneys who shall be licensed to practice law by the supreme court in good standing. Members of the constables’ board shall serve for terms of five (5) years until a successor is appointed and qualified.

A representative of the board may attend hearings in order to furnish advice to the department. The board may also consult with the department of business regulation from time to time on matters relating to constable certification.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 9; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 6, effective June 27, 2022.

9-5-11.
District court process returnable in any division.

Writs and other process from the district court, duly signed and sealed, may be made returnable in any division, including writs of replevin; provided, that writs of replevin shall be made returnable to the district court in any division in which the goods or chattels to be replevied are taken, attached, or detained.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 504; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 8; P.L. 1942, ch. 1143, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-11

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 13; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 8.

9-5-12, 9-5-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 505; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, §§ 9, 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, §§ 9, 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, §§ 9, 10; G.L. 1956, §§

9-5-12

, 9-5-13; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 14, effective January 10, 1966. For present form of summons, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 4(a) and Form 1.

9-5-14.
Writs of mesne process.

The plaintiff in any action may, as often as may be necessary, at any time before final judgment in the action, sue out a writ of mesne process to be made returnable to the court in which the action is then pending, the writ of mesne process commanding the attachment of the real or personal estate of the defendant, including his or her personal estate in the hands or possession of any person, partnership, or corporation, as the trustee of the defendant, and his or her stock or shares in any banking association or other incorporated company, and may also sue out a writ of mesne process commanding the arrest of the defendant unless the defendant has been arrested in the action; provided, that the plaintiff, his or her agent, or attorney shall make affidavit, to be endorsed on or annexed to the writ, setting forth facts which would authorize an attachment or arrest at the commencement of the action. The writ of mesne process shall conform, as nearly as may be, to a writ of attachment or arrest issued at the commencement of an action and shall be returnable at a time, before final judgment, to be specified in the writ.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 513; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 11; P.L. 1942, ch. 1143, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-14

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 13.

9-5-15.
Form for writs of replevin.

Writs of replevin shall be substantially in the following form: WRIT OF REPLEVIN. THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND. SC. To the sheriffs of our several counties, their deputies, or to a certified constable, (SEAL) Greeting: We command you that you replevy, if to be found within your precinct, the goods and chattels following, viz.: (Here enumerate and particularly describe them) belonging to of now taken (detained, or attached as the case may be) by of at in the county of and them deliver unto the said , provided the same are not taken, attached, or detained upon original writ, mesne process, warrant of distress, or upon execution as the property of the said ; and summon the said to appear on the return-day hereof (said return-day being the day of A.D. 20) in the SUPERIOR COURT to be holden at the county courthouse at , to answer unto the said in a plea of replevin that the said on the . day of at said unlawfully, and without justifiable cause, took the goods and chattels of the said . as aforesaid, and them unlawfully detained unto this day, (or, unlawfully detained the goods and chattels aforesaid, as the case may be) to the damage of the said , as he or she says, dollars. Hereof fail not, and make true return of this writ with your doings thereon, together with the bond you shall take of the plaintiff. Witness, the seal of our superior court, at this day of in the year , Clerk.

Click to view

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 515; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-15

; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 8; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 8; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 5, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 5, effective June 23, 2021.

9-5-16, 9-5-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 515, 516; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, §§ 19, 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, §§ 12, 13; G.L. 1956, §§

9-5-16

, 9-5-17; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 14, effective January 10, 1966. Writs of scire facias have been abolished in both the superior and district courts, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 81(c) and Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 81(c).

9-5-18.
Adaptation of forms to more than one defendant.

Whenever process shall issue against more than one defendant, the forms provided by law may be altered so as to combine the summons, the writ of arrest, and the writ of attachment, in order that they may be served on one or more of the defendants by one form of service and on the other or others by another form of service.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 518; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-18

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 13.

9-5-19.
Adaptation of forms not prescribed.

Every court shall adapt the form of process necessary to be issued thereby, whenever no form is prescribed, so as to conform to law and, as far as the nature of the case will admit, to the forms prescribed in this chapter and in applicable procedural rules.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 519; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-19

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 13.

9-5-20.
Writs and other process against unknown defendant.

Whenever the name of any defendant or respondent is not known to the plaintiff, the summons and other process may issue against him or her by a fictitious name, or by such description as the plaintiff or complainant may select; and if duly served, it shall not be abated for that cause, but may be amended with or without terms as the court may order.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 520; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-20

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 13.

9-5-21.
Signature of processes in action involving clerk of court.

Whenever the clerk of any court shall be a party to an action, suit, or other proceeding, civil or criminal, all processes issuing from the court thereon shall be signed by a justice thereof.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 521; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-21

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 13.

9-5-22.
False swearing in affidavit to support writ.

Every person who shall willfully swear falsely to any statement in an affidavit made by him or her, by means of which affidavit a writ of arrest or attachment shall have issued and been served by arrest or attachment, shall be deemed guilty of perjury.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 522; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 514, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-22

.

9-5-23.
Time of service of original writs — Writs returnable on holiday.

Every original writ issuing from the superior court shall be returnable thereto on the day named in the writ, and shall be served not less than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days before the return day thereof, except in those cases in which special provision by law shall be made to the contrary; and every original writ issuing from a district court shall be served not less than six (6) nor more than twenty (20) days before the return day thereof; provided, that writs issued in civil actions returnable to any court on a legal holiday shall not thereby abate, but may be entered on the next court day of the court for civil business with the same effect as if made returnable at such later court day, and in such event all periods of time for pleading and for action of every character in the case shall begin to run from the court day next following the legal holiday.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 525; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 515, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-23

.

9-5-24.
Service on Sunday void.

No civil process whatsoever shall be served on Sunday, but every such service shall be utterly void.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 559; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 41; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 515, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-24

.

9-5-25.
Exemption of voters from arrest.

All persons entitled to vote shall be protected from arrest in civil cases, on the days of election for city or town officers, and for state officers, representatives in congress, and electors of president and vice-president of the United States; and on the day preceding and the day following the election.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 14, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 20, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 19, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 327, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-25

.

9-5-26.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 526; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 515, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-26

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 14, effective January 10, 1966. For manner of service in superior court, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 4(d). For manner of service in district court, see Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 4(d) — (g).

9-5-27.
Service on nonresident guardian, executor, or administrator.

Service of any process may be made by any disinterested person upon any nonresident guardian, executor, or administrator, appointed or approved by any court of probate in this state, either by reading the process to him or her or by leaving an attested copy thereof with him or her, or by leaving the copy at his or her last and usual place of abode with some person living there; and in the latter case, by also publishing notice to him or her in such manner as the court, out of which the process issues, shall direct. And if the guardian, executor, or administrator shall not appear and answer the process, the probate court may, in its discretion, remove the guardian, executor, or administrator.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 552; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 515, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-27

.

9-5-28.
Affidavit or admission of service on nonresident.

A disinterested person, serving process as provided in §

9-5-27

, shall make affidavit of the service thereof, and of the manner in which, the time when, and the place where the service was made; or the service thereof may be made by the admission of service by the guardian, executor, or administrator, on the back of the process, and by his or her acknowledgment thereof some officer authorized to administer oaths.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 553; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 515, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-28

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 18.

9-5-29.
Appointment of attorney by nonresidents doing business in state.

Every individual not a resident of this state and every partnership composed of persons not such residents, having a usual place of business in this state, temporarily or permanently, or engaged here, temporarily or permanently, and with or without a usual place of business here, in the construction, erection, alteration, or repair of a building, bridge, railroad, railway, or structure of any kind, shall, before carrying on business in this state, file in the office of the secretary of state a written power appointing some competent person resident in this state as his or her or its attorney with authority to accept service of process against the individual or partnership in this state, containing an agreement on the part of the maker that the service of any lawful process in this state on the attorney shall be of the same force and validity as service on the individual or partnership; and providing, that, in case of garnishment, when the fees therefor shall have been paid or tendered, the attorney may make the affidavit required by law in such cases.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1614, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 516, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-29

.

9-5-30.
Replacement of attorney for nonresident — Revocation of power.

If resident attorney, as provided in §

9-5-29

, shall die, resign, or remove from the state, the individual or partnership shall forthwith file with the secretary of state a further similar written power appointing some other competent resident in this state as his or her or its attorney for the purpose as provided in §

9-5-29

. No power of attorney required to be filed by § 9-5-29 shall be revoked until after a like power shall have been given to some other competent person resident in this state and filed. Any such individual or partnership which has ceased to have a usual place of business in this state or to be engaged in this state in the construction, erection, alteration, or repair of a building, bridge, railroad, railway, or structure of any kind, may, however, revoke the power of attorney by a written instrument of revocation filed in the office of the secretary of state; but no such revocation shall be effective as to any liability arising out of any act or omission occurring prior to the time when the individual or partnership ceased to have a usual place of business in this state or to be engaged here.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1614, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 516, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-30

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 18.

9-5-31.
Filing fee for power of attorney.

A fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be paid to the secretary of state, for the use of the state, upon the filing in his or her office of any paper required to be filed by §§

9-5-29

—

9-5-32

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1614, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 516, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-31

.

9-5-32.
Notice to nonresident to appoint attorney — Agents for noncomplying persons.

Every individual or partnership required by §§

9-5-29

—

9-5-31

to file a power of attorney and failing so to do shall be notified by the secretary of state, upon information and request by any resident of this state, of the requirements of §§

9-5-29

—

9-5-32

; and every person who acts within the state as agent of any such individual or partnership which fails, after receipt of the notice from the secretary of state, to file the power shall for such failure be liable to a penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day during which the person has so acted after the receipt of the notice by the individual or partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1614, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 516, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-5-32

.

9-5-33.
Jurisdiction over foreign corporations and over nonresident individuals, partnerships, or associations.

Every foreign corporation, every individual not a resident of this state or his or her executor or administrator, and every partnership or association, composed of any person or persons not such residents, that shall have the necessary minimum contacts with the state of Rhode Island, shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the state of Rhode Island, and the courts of this state shall hold such foreign corporations and such nonresident individuals or their executors or administrators, and such partnerships or associations amenable to suit in Rhode Island in every case not contrary to the provisions of the constitution or laws of the United States.

Service of process may be made on any such foreign corporation, nonresident individual or his or her executor or administrator, and such partnership or association within or without the state in the manner provided by any applicable procedural rule or in the manner prescribed by order of the court in which the action is brought.

Nothing herein shall limit or affect the right to serve process upon the nonresident individual or his or her executor or administrator, or the partnership or association, or a foreign corporation within this state or without this state in any manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 13; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 7.

9-5-34.
Appointment of attorney by foreign corporations.

Every foreign corporation that manufactures products that are sold in the state shall file in the office of the secretary of state a written power appointing some competent person resident in this state as its attorney with authority to accept service of process against the corporation in the state, containing an agreement on the part of the maker that the service of any lawful process in this state on the attorney shall be of the same force and validity as service on the corporation; provided, however, that in case no written power appointing an attorney for service for the foreign corporation is filed, then the secretary of state shall be the attorney for service for the foreign corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 52, § 1.

9-5-35.
Service of court papers at work.

No employer within this state is permitted to refuse or obstruct the service of any court process upon an employee at the place of employment and such service shall not be grounds for dismissal of the employee. The employer may designate an area where the service may be effected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 89, § 1.